Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3810
Department; contracts; limitations.

The department in entering into contracts authorized under the Nebraska Agricultural Products Marketing Act shall not be authorized to set up marketing units or agencies of its own. Only contracts necessary to the furtherance of the intent and purposes of the act shall be entered into.

Laws 1979, LB 538, § 10;

Laws 1988, LB 807, § 6.